Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1045
Attachment; discharge; duty of clerk to certify; duty of register of deeds to record.

If the order of attachment is discharged it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which the action is brought to certify that fact, together with the time when the order was discharged, to the register of deeds in whose office the copy of the order has been recorded as aforesaid, whereupon such register shall file such certificate and write across the record of such copy the word "discharged," and also the time of discharge as shown in the certificate.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 3, p. 714;

R.S.1913, § 7774;

C.S.1922, § 8718;

C.S.1929, § 20-1045;

R.S.1943, § 25-1045.